California statutes. Civil Code
(b) Any act of willful misconduct of a minor that results in the defacement of property of another with paint or a similar substance shall be imputed to the parent or guardian having custody and control of the minor for all purposes of civil damages, including court costs, and attorney’s fees, to the prevailing party, and the parent or guardian having custody and control shall be jointly and severally liable with the minor for any damages resulting from the willful misconduct, not to exceed
 twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), except as provided in subdivision (c), for each tort of the minor.

(c) The amounts listed in subdivisions (a) and (b) shall be adjusted every two years by the Judicial Council to reflect any increases in the cost of living in California, as indicated by the annual average of the California Consumer Price Index. The Judicial Council shall round this adjusted amount up or down to the nearest hundred dollars. On or before July 1 of each odd-numbered year, the Judicial Council shall compute and publish the amounts listed in subdivisions (a) and (b), as adjusted according to this subdivision.

(d) The maximum liability imposed by this section is the maximum liability authorized under this section at the time that the act of willful misconduct by a minor was committed.

(e) Nothing in
 this section shall impose liability on an insurer for a loss caused by the willful act of the insured for purposes of Section 533 of the Insurance Code. An insurer shall not be liable for the conduct imputed to a parent or guardian by this section for any amount in excess of ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 738, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

1714.2.

(a) In order to encourage citizens to participate in emergency medical services training programs and to render emergency medical services to fellow citizens, no person who has completed a basic cardiopulmonary resuscitation course which complies with the standards adopted by the American Heart Association or the American Red Cross for cardiopulmonary resuscitation and emergency cardiac care, and who, in good faith, renders emergency cardiopulmonary resuscitation at the scene of an emergency shall be liable for any civil damages as a result of any acts or omissions by such person rendering the emergency care.

(b) This section shall not be construed to grant immunity from civil damages to any person whose conduct in rendering such emergency care constitutes gross negligence.

(c) In order to encourage local agencies and other organizations to train citizens in cardiopulmonary resuscitation techniques, no local agency, entity of state or local government, or other public or private organization which sponsors, authorizes, supports, finances, or supervises the training of citizens in cardiopulmonary resuscitation shall be liable for any civil damages alleged to result from such training programs.

(d) In order to encourage qualified individuals to instruct citizens in cardiopulmonary resuscitation, no person who is certified to instruct in cardiopulmonary resuscitation by either the American Heart Association or the American Red
 Cross shall be liable for any civil damages alleged to result from the acts or omissions of an individual who received instruction on cardiopulmonary resuscitation by that certified instructor.

(e) This section shall not be construed to grant immunity from civil damages to any person who renders such emergency care to an individual with the expectation of receiving compensation from the individual for providing the emergency care.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 595.)
-------------------------------------------

1714.21.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “AED” or “defibrillator” means an automated external defibrillator.

(2) “CPR” means cardiopulmonary resuscitation.

(b) Any person who,
 in good faith and not for compensation, renders emergency care or treatment by the use of an AED at the scene of an emergency is not liable for any civil damages resulting from any acts or omissions in rendering the emergency care.

(c) A person or entity who provides CPR and AED training to a person who renders emergency care pursuant to subdivision (b) is not liable for any civil damages resulting from any acts or omissions of the person rendering the emergency care.

(d) (1) A person or entity that acquires an AED for emergency use pursuant to this section is not liable for any civil damages resulting from any acts or omissions in the rendering of the emergency care by use of an AED if that person or entity has complied with subdivision (b) of Section 1797.196 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) A physician and surgeon or other health care professional that is involved in the selection, placement, or installation of an AED pursuant to Section 1797.196 of the Health and Safety Code is not liable for civil damages resulting from acts or omissions in the rendering of emergency care by use of that AED.

(e) The protections specified in this section do not apply in the case of personal injury or wrongful death that results from the gross negligence or willful or wanton misconduct of the person who renders emergency care or treatment by the use of an AED.

(f) This section does not relieve a manufacturer, designer, developer, distributor, installer, or supplier of an AED or defibrillator of any liability under any applicable statute or rule of law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 264, Sec. 1.   (SB 658)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1714.22.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Opioid antagonist” means naloxone hydrochloride or any other opioid antagonist that is approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration for the treatment of an opioid overdose.

(2) “Opioid overdose prevention and treatment training program” means any program operated by a local health jurisdiction or that is registered by a local health jurisdiction to train individuals to prevent, recognize, and respond to an opiate overdose, and that provides, at a minimum, training in all of the following:

(A) The causes of an opiate overdose.

(B) Basic life support.

(C) How to contact appropriate emergency medical services.

(D) How to administer an opioid antagonist.

(b) A licensed health care provider who is authorized by law to prescribe an opioid antagonist may, if acting with reasonable care, prescribe and subsequently dispense or distribute an opioid antagonist to a person at risk of an overdose or to a family member, friend, or other person in a position to assist a person at risk of an overdose.

(c) (1) A licensed health care provider who is authorized by law to
 prescribe an opioid antagonist may issue standing orders for the distribution of an opioid antagonist to a person at risk of an overdose or to a family member, friend, or other person in a position to assist a person at risk of an overdose.

(2) A licensed health care provider who is authorized by law to prescribe an opioid antagonist may issue standing orders for the administration of an opioid antagonist to a person at risk of an overdose by a family member, friend, or other person in a position to assist a person experiencing or reasonably suspected of experiencing an overdose.

(3) A person who is at risk of an overdose or any person in a position to assist a person at risk of an overdose may possess an opioid antagonist and subsequently dispense or distribute an opioid
 antagonist to a person at risk of an overdose or to any other person in a position to assist a person at risk of an overdose.

(d) A licensed health care provider who acts with reasonable care shall not be subject to professional review or subject to criminal prosecution for issuing a prescription or order or for possessing, administering, or distributing an opioid antagonist pursuant to subdivision (b) or (c), or for liability in a civil action for any injuries or damages relating to or resulting from the acts or omissions of any person who administers the opioid antagonist in good faith and not for compensation pursuant to this section.

(e) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, a person who possesses or distributes an opioid antagonist for the purposes
 specified in subdivision (b) or (c) shall not be subject to professional review or be subject to criminal prosecution for their possession or distribution. 

(2) Consistent with Section 1799.102 of the Health and Safety Code, any person who administers an opioid antagonist, in good faith and not for compensation, to a person who is experiencing or is suspected of experiencing an overdose is not liable for civil damages resulting from any act or omission relating to such administration, other than an act or omission constituting gross negligence or willful or wanton misconduct.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 569, Sec. 1.   (AB 1037)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

1714.23.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Anaphylaxis” means a potentially life-threatening hypersensitivity or allergic reaction to a substance.

(A) Symptoms of anaphylaxis may include shortness of breath, wheezing, difficulty breathing,
 difficulty talking or swallowing, hives, itching, swelling, shock, or asthma.

(B) Causes of anaphylaxis may include, but are not limited to, insect stings or bites, foods, drugs, and other allergens, as well as idiopathic or exercise-induced anaphylaxis.

(2) “Epinephrine auto-injector” means a disposable delivery device designed for the automatic injection of a premeasured dose of epinephrine into the human body to prevent or treat a life-threatening allergic reaction.

(b) (1) Any person described in subdivision (b) of Section 1797.197a of the Health and Safety Code who administers an epinephrine auto-injector, in good faith and not for compensation, to another person who appears to be experiencing anaphylaxis at the scene of an emergency situation is not liable for any civil damages resulting
 from his or her acts or omissions in administering the epinephrine auto-injector, if that person has complied with the requirements and standards of Section 1797.197a of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) (A) An authorized entity shall not be liable for any civil damages resulting from any act or omission other than an act or omission constituting gross negligence or willful or wanton misconduct connected to the administration of an epinephrine auto-injector by any one of its employees, volunteers, or agents who is a lay rescuer, as defined by paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 1797.197a of the Health and Safety Code, if the entity has complied with all applicable requirements of Section 1797.197a of the Health and Safety Code.

(B) The failure of an authorized entity to possess or administer an epinephrine auto-injector shall not result in civil
 liability.

(3) This subdivision does not affect any other immunity or defense that is available under law.

(c) The protection specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) shall not apply in a case of personal injury or wrongful death that results from the gross negligence or willful or wanton misconduct of the person who renders emergency care treatment by the use of an epinephrine auto-injector.

(d) Nothing in this section relieves a manufacturer, designer, developer, distributor, or supplier of an epinephrine auto-injector of liability under any other applicable law.

(e) An authorizing physician and surgeon is not subject to professional review, liable in a civil action, or subject to criminal prosecution for the issuance of a prescription or order
 in accordance with Section 1797.197a of the Health and Safety Code unless the physician and surgeon’s issuance of the prescription or order constitutes gross negligence or willful or malicious conduct.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 374, Sec. 2.   (AB 1386)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1714.24.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Collector” includes only those entities authorized by and registered with the federal Drug Enforcement Administration to receive a controlled substance for the purpose of destruction, if the entity is in good standing with any applicable licensing authority.

(2) “Compensation” means reimbursement or funds received from a customer to compensate for the cost incurred in obtaining, installing, or maintaining a secure drug take-back bin. “Compensation” does not include reimbursement or funds received from any other person or entity, other than a customer, to compensate for the costs incurred in obtaining, installing, or maintaining a secure drug take-back bin.

(3) “Home-generated pharmaceutical waste” means a pharmaceutical that is no longer wanted or needed by the consumer and includes any delivery system, such as pills, liquids, and inhalers.

(4) “Maintains” includes owning, leasing, operating, or otherwise hosting a secure drug take-back bin on the collector’s premises.

(5) “Pharmaceutical” means a prescription or over-the-counter human or veterinary drug,
 including, but not limited to, a drug as defined in Section 109925 of the Health and Safety Code and Section 321(g)(1) of Title 21 of the United States Code. “Pharmaceutical” includes controlled substances included in Schedule II, III, IV, or V of the California Uniform Controlled Substances Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 11000) of the Health and Safety Code), but does not include a controlled substance included in Schedule I.

(6) “Secure drug take-back bin” means a collection receptacle as described in Section 1317.75 of Title 21 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(b) Any collector that maintains a secure drug take-back bin shall not be liable in a civil action, or be subject to criminal prosecution, for any injury or harm that results from the collector maintaining a secure drug take-back bin on its premises provided that the collector, not for compensation, acts in
 good faith to take all of the following steps to ensure the health and safety of consumers and employees and the proper disposal in the waste stream of the home-generated pharmaceutical waste contained in a secure drug take-back bin, unless the injury or harm results from the collector’s gross negligence or willful and wanton misconduct:

(1) Complies with all applicable state and federal laws and regulations relating to the collection of home-generated pharmaceutical waste for disposal in secure drug take-back bins, including, but not limited to, the federal Secure and Responsible Drug Disposal Act of 2010 (Public Law 111-273).

(2) Notifies local law enforcement and any local environmental health department as to the existence and location of any secure drug take-back bin on the collector’s premises and the status of the collector’s registration as a collector with the federal
 Drug Enforcement Administration.

(3) Ensures that the secure drug take-back bin is placed in a location that is regularly monitored by employees of the registered collector.

(4) Ensures that conspicuous signage is posted on the secure drug take-back bin that clearly notifies customers as to what controlled and noncontrolled substances are and are not acceptable for deposit into the bin, as well as the hours during which collection is allowed.

(5) Ensures that public access to the secure drug take-back bin is limited to hours in which employees of the registered collector are present and able to monitor the operation of the secure drug take-back bin.

(6) Regularly inspects the area surrounding the secure drug take-back bin for potential tampering or
 diversion. Record logs of those inspections shall be maintained and retained for two years, reflecting the date and time of the inspection, and the initials of the employee inspecting the area. The logs shall be maintained in writing or electronically and may be combined with logs required by state or federal regulations. The logs may be used to demonstrate regular inspection of the area. Other records or reports mandated by federal or state regulations shall also be retained for a minimum of two years unless regulations mandate a longer period.

(7) Notifies local law enforcement authorities of any suspected or known tampering, theft, or significant loss of controlled substances, within one business day of discovery. If the collector maintains daily business hours, this notification shall be made within one calendar day.

(8) Notify local law enforcement as to any decision to
 discontinue its voluntary collection of controlled substances and provide documentation of its written notification to the federal Drug Enforcement Administration’s Registration Unit as otherwise required under federal laws and regulations.

(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to require entities that may qualify as a collector to acquire, maintain, or make available to the public a secure drug take-back bin on its premises.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 238, Sec. 2.   (SB 1229)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1714.25.

(a) Except for injury resulting from gross negligence or intentional misconduct in the preparation or handling of donated food, no person, gleaner, or food facility that donates food that is fit for human consumption at the time it was donated to a nonprofit charitable organization or food bank shall be liable for any damage or injury resulting from the consumption of the donated food. Food facilities may donate food
 directly to end recipients for consumption.

The immunity from civil liability provided by this subdivision applies regardless of compliance with any laws, regulations, or ordinances regulating the packaging or labeling of food, and regardless of compliance with any laws, regulations, or ordinances regulating the storage or handling of the food by the donee after the donation of the food. The donation of nonperishable food that is fit for human consumption but that has exceeded the labeled shelf life date recommended by the manufacturer is protected under the California Good Samaritan Food Donation Act. The donation of perishable food that is fit for human consumption but that has exceeded the labeled shelf life date recommended by the manufacturer is protected under the California Good Samaritan Food Donation Act if the person that distributes the food to the end recipient makes a good faith evaluation that the food to be donated is wholesome.

(b) A nonprofit charitable organization or a food bank that, in good faith, receives and distributes food without charge that is fit for human consumption at the time it was distributed is not liable for an injury or death due to the food unless the injury or death is a direct result of the gross negligence or intentional misconduct of the organization.

(c) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to limit the ability of a person, gleaner, or food facility to donate food.

(d) For the purposes of this section:

(1) “Food bank” has the same meaning as defined in Section 113783 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) “Food facility” has the same meaning as defined in Section 113789 of the Health and
 Safety Code.

(3) “Gleaner” means a person who harvests for free distribution to the needy, or for donation to a nonprofit organization for ultimate distribution to the needy, an agricultural crop that has been donated by the owner.

(4) “Nonprofit charitable organization” has the same meaning as defined in Section 113841 of the Health and Safety Code.

(5) “Person” means an individual, school, local educational agency as defined in Section 421 of the Education Code, corporation, partnership, limited liability company, organization, association, or governmental entity, including a retail grocer, wholesaler, hotel, motel, manufacturer, restaurant, caterer, farmer, and nonprofit food distributor or hospital. In the case of a corporation, partnership, organization, association, or governmental entity, the term includes an
 officer, director, partner, manager or managing member, deacon, trustee, council member, or other elected or appointed individual responsible for the governance of the entity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 619, Sec. 3.   (AB 1219)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

1714.26.

(a) Except for damage or injury resulting from gross negligence or a willful act, there is no liability for any damage or injury on the part of a nonprofit charitable organization that provides vision screenings and, if applicable, provides donated or recycled eyeglasses, or a participating licensed optometrist, ophthalmologist, or trained volunteer who works with such a nonprofit charitable organization in the performance of vision screenings, if all of the
 following conditions are met:

(1) The vision screening is provided to address ocular health concerns and, if applicable, to provide a temporary solution in the form of donated or recycled eyeglasses until the patient can get a full examination and eyeglasses.

(2) The vision screening is not intended to replace a full ocular health examination provided by a licensed optometrist or ophthalmologist.

(3) The patient signs a waiver acknowledging that the services provided are a temporary solution until the patient can get a full examination by a licensed optometrist or ophthalmologist.

(4) Each vision screening is supervised by an attending licensed optometrist or ophthalmologist.

(5) The
 eyeglass prescription determinations and ocular health recommendations are provided by an attending licensed optometrist or ophthalmologist.

(6) A written prescription is not provided to the patient.

(7) The eyeglasses provided to the patients are a close or approximate match, within tolerances allowed by the attending licensed optometrist or ophthalmologist, to the prescription determined during the vision screening.

(8) The vision screening and eyeglasses are provided without a charge.

(9) The optometrist, ophthalmologist, or volunteer is authorized by the nonprofit organization to provide the vision screening and eyeglasses on behalf of the nonprofit organization and is acting within the scope of his or her authorized responsibilities and the
 guidelines of the nonprofit charitable organization when providing the vision screening or eyeglasses.

(10) The nonprofit charitable organization provides procedural, risk management, and quality control training, as applicable, to the participating optometrist, ophthalmologist, or volunteer who provides the vision screening or eyeglasses.

(b) The limitation of liability provided in subdivision (a) is not applicable if an action is brought by an officer of a state or local government pursuant to state or local law.

(c) The limitation of liability provided in subdivision (a) is not applicable if the conduct of the nonprofit charitable organization, optometrist, ophthalmologist, or volunteer includes any of the following types of misconduct:

(1) A crime
 of violence.

(2) A hate crime.

(3) An act involving a sexual offense.

(4) An act involving misconduct in violation of federal or state civil rights laws.

(5) An act performed while the defendant was under the influence of drugs or alcohol.

(d) For the purposes of this section:

(1) “Nonprofit charitable organization” means an organization exempt from federal income tax as an organization described in Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(2) “Vision screening” means a test or examination of an individual using a portion of the usual examination
 procedures in a comprehensive eye examination and refraction, that are selected or directed by an attending licensed optometrist or ophthalmologist, and are within the guidelines of the nonprofit charitable organization.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 68, Sec. 1.   (SB 724)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

1714.27.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, and except as provided in subdivision (b), a person not otherwise licensed to administer anti-seizure rescue medication, but who administers anti-seizure rescue medication at the scene of an emergency, in good faith and not for compensation, to a person who is experiencing, or is suspected of experiencing, a seizure shall not be subject to professional review, be liable in a civil action, or be subject to criminal prosecution for this administration so long as the person’s conduct is not grossly negligent
 and does not constitute willful or wanton misconduct.

(b) Subdivision (a) shall not apply to administration of anti-seizure rescue medication to a pupil on a school site which shall, instead, comply with Article 4.6 (commencing with Section 49468) of Chapter 9 of Part 27 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Education Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 33, Sec. 1.   (AB 369)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

1714.29.

(a) For purposes of this section, “trauma kit” means a first aid response kit that contains at least all of the following:

(1) One tourniquet endorsed by the Committee on Tactical Combat Casualty Care.

(2) One bleeding control bandage.

(3) One pair of nonlatex protective gloves and a marker.

(4) One pair of scissors.

(5) Instructional documents developed by the Stop the Bleed national awareness campaign of the United States Department
 of Homeland Security or the American College of Surgeons Committee on Trauma, the American Red Cross, the Committee for Tactical Emergency Casualty Care, or any other partner of the United States Department of Defense.

(b) Medical materials and equipment similar to those described in paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, of subdivision (a) and any additional items that are approved by the medical director of the local emergency medical services agency may be included as supplements in addition to the items described in paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, of subdivision (a) if they adequately treat a traumatic injury and can be stored in a readily available kit.

(c) Subdivision (b) of Section 1799.102 of the Health and Safety Code, the “Good Samaritan Law,” applies to any lay
 rescuer or person who, in good faith and not for compensation, renders emergency care or treatment by the use of a trauma kit at the scene of an emergency.

(d) A person who renders emergency care or treatment by the use of a trauma kit at the scene of an emergency and who receives compensation as a result of their employment by a property managing entity, a tenant of a building, or any other private or public employer, but is not compensated to provide emergency medical care, is not providing emergency medical care “for compensation” for purposes of Section 1799.102 of the Health and Safety Code.

(e) Section 1799.100 of the Health and Safety Code applies to a person or entity that voluntarily, and without expectation and receipt of compensation, does either of the
 following:

(1) Provides training in the use of a trauma kit to provide emergency medical treatment to victims of trauma, including, but not limited to, training in the use of the trauma kit in emergency first care response to an active shooter.

(2) Certifies persons, other than physicians and surgeons, registered nurses, and licensed vocational nurses, who are trained in the use of a trauma kit to provide emergency medical treatment to victims of trauma.

(f) This section does not require a property manager or person
 employed by a property managing entity to respond to an emergency with the use of trauma kits.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 586, Sec. 2.   (AB 2260)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1714.3.

Civil liability for any injury to the person or property of another proximately caused by the discharge of a firearm by a minor under the age of 18 years shall be imputed to a parent or guardian having custody and control of the minor for all purposes of civil damages, and such parent or guardian shall be jointly and severally liable with such minor for any damages resulting from such act, if such parent or guardian either permitted the minor to have the firearm or left the firearm in a place accessible to the minor.

The liability imposed by this section is in addition to any liability otherwise imposed by law.
 However, no person, or group of persons collectively, shall incur liability under this section in any amount exceeding thirty thousand dollars ($30,000) for injury to or death of one person as a result of any one occurrence or, subject to the limit as to one person, exceeding sixty thousand dollars ($60,000) for injury to or death of all persons as a result of any one such occurrence.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1099, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1714.4.

(a) Any person or business entity that knowingly assists a child support obligor who has an unpaid child support obligation to escape, evade, or avoid paying court-ordered or court-approved child support shall be liable for three times the value of the assistance provided, such as the fair market value of the obligor’s assets transferred or hidden. The maximum liability imposed by this section shall not exceed the entire child support obligation due. Any funds or assets collected pursuant to this section shall be paid to the child support
 obligee, and shall not reduce the amount of the unpaid child support obligation. Upon the satisfaction of the unpaid child support obligation, this section shall not apply.

(b) For purposes of this section, actions taken to knowingly assist a child support obligor to escape, evade, or avoid paying court-ordered or court-approved child support include, with actual knowledge of the child support obligation, helping to hide or transfer assets of the child support obligor.

(c) This section shall not apply to a financial institution unless the financial institution has actual knowledge of the child support obligation and, with that knowledge, knowingly assists the obligor to escape, evade, or avoid paying the child support obligation. However, a financial institution with knowledge of an asset transfer has no duty to inquire into the rightfulness of the transaction, nor shall it be
 deemed to have knowingly assisted an obligor to escape, evade, or avoid paying the child support obligation if that assistance is provided by an employee or agent of the financial institution acting outside the terms and conditions of employment or agency without the actual knowledge of the financial institution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 820, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

1714.41.

(a) Any person or business entity that knowingly assists a child support obligor who has an unpaid child support obligation to escape, evade, or avoid paying court-ordered or court-approved child support shall be liable for three times the value of the assistance provided, such as the fair market value of the assets transferred or hidden, or the amount of the wages or other compensation paid to the child support obligor but not reported. The maximum liability imposed by this section shall not exceed the entire child support obligation due.
 Any funds or assets collected pursuant to this section shall be paid to the child support obligee, and shall not reduce the amount of the unpaid child support obligation. Upon the satisfaction of the unpaid child support obligation, this section shall not apply.

(b) For purposes of this section, actions taken to knowingly assist a child support obligor to escape, evade, or avoid paying court-ordered or court-approved child support include, but are not limited to, any of the following actions taken when the individual or entity knew or should have known of the child support obligation:

(1) Hiring or employing the child support obligor as an employee in a trade or business and failing to timely file a report of new employees with the California New Employee Registry maintained by the Employment Development Department.

(2) Engaging the child support obligor as a service provider and failing to timely file a report with the Employment Development Department as required by Section 1088.8 of the Unemployment Insurance Code.

(3) When engaged in a trade or business, paying wages or other forms of compensation for services rendered by a child support obligor that are not reported to the Employment Development Department as required, including, but not limited to, payment in cash or via barter or trade.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 820, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

1714.43.

(a) (1) Every retail seller and manufacturer doing business in this state and having annual worldwide gross receipts that exceed one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) shall disclose, as set forth in subdivision (c), its efforts to eradicate slavery and human trafficking from its direct supply chain for tangible goods offered for sale.

(2) For the
 purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(A) “Doing business in this state” shall have the same meaning as set forth in Section 23101 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(B) “Gross receipts” shall have the same meaning as set forth in Section 25120 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(C) “Manufacturer” means a business entity with manufacturing as its principal business activity code, as reported on the entity’s tax return filed under Part 10.2 (commencing with Section 18401) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(D) “Retail seller” means a business entity with retail trade as its principal business activity code, as reported on the entity’s tax return filed under Part 10.2 (commencing with Section 18401) of Division 2 of
 the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(b) The disclosure described in subdivision (a) shall be posted on the retail seller’s or manufacturer’s Internet Web site with a conspicuous and easily understood link to the required information placed on the business’ homepage. In the event the retail seller or manufacturer does not have an Internet Web site, consumers shall be provided the written disclosure within 30 days of receiving a written request for the disclosure from a consumer.

(c) The disclosure described in subdivision (a) shall, at a minimum, disclose to what extent, if any, that the retail seller or manufacturer does each of the following:

(1) Engages in verification of product supply chains to evaluate and address risks of human trafficking and slavery. The disclosure shall specify if the verification was not
 conducted by a third party.

(2) Conducts audits of suppliers to evaluate supplier compliance with company standards for trafficking and slavery in supply chains. The disclosure shall specify if the verification was not an independent, unannounced audit.

(3) Requires direct suppliers to certify that materials incorporated into the product comply with the laws regarding slavery and human trafficking of the country or countries in which they are doing business.

(4) Maintains internal accountability standards and procedures for employees or contractors failing to meet company standards regarding slavery and trafficking.

(5) Provides company employees and management, who have direct responsibility for supply chain management, training on human trafficking
 and slavery, particularly with respect to mitigating risks within the supply chains of products.

(d) The exclusive remedy for a violation of this section shall be an action brought by the Attorney General for injunctive relief. Nothing in this section shall limit remedies available for a violation of any other state or federal law.

(e) The provisions of this section shall take effect on January 1, 2012.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 556, Sec. 3.   (SB 657)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Section operative January 1, 2012, pursuant to its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

1714.45.

(a) In a product liability action, a manufacturer or seller shall not be liable if both of the following apply:

(1) The product is inherently unsafe and the product is known to be unsafe by the ordinary consumer who consumes the product with the ordinary knowledge common to the community.

(2) The product is a common consumer product intended for personal consumption, such as sugar, castor oil, alcohol, and
 butter, as identified in comment i to Section 402A of the Restatement (Second) of Torts.

(b) This section does not exempt the manufacture or sale of tobacco products by tobacco manufacturers and their successors in interest from product liability actions, but does exempt the sale or distribution of tobacco products by any other person, including, but not limited to, retailers or distributors.

(c) For purposes of this section, the term “product liability action” means any action for injury or death caused by a product, except that the term does not include an action based on a manufacturing defect or breach of an express warranty.

(d) This section is intended to be declarative of and does not alter or amend existing California law, including Cronin v. J.B.E. Olson Corp. (1972), 8 Cal. 3d 121, and shall apply to all
 product liability actions pending on, or commenced after, January 1, 1988.

(e) This section does not apply to, and never applied to, an action brought by a public entity to recover the value of benefits provided to individuals injured by a tobacco-related illness caused by the tortious conduct of a tobacco company or its successor in interest, including, but not limited to, an action brought pursuant to Section 14124.71 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. In the action brought by a public entity, the fact that the injured individual’s claim against the defendant may be barred by a prior version of this section shall not be a defense. This subdivision does not constitute a change in, but is declaratory of, existing law relating to tobacco products.

(f) It is the intention of the Legislature in enacting the amendments to subdivisions (a) and (b) of this section adopted at the
 1997–98 Regular Session to declare that there exists no statutory bar to tobacco-related personal injury, wrongful death, or other tort claims against tobacco manufacturers and their successors in interest by California smokers or others who have suffered or incurred injuries, damages, or costs arising from the promotion, marketing, sale, or consumption of tobacco products. It is also the intention of the Legislature to clarify that those claims that were or are brought shall be determined on their merits, without the imposition of any claim of statutory bar or categorical defense.

(g) This section shall not be construed to grant immunity to a tobacco industry research organization.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 485, Sec. 38.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

1714.46.

(a) “Artificial intelligence” means an engineered or machine-based system that varies in its level of autonomy and that can, for explicit or implicit objectives, infer from the input it receives how to generate outputs that can influence physical or virtual environments.

(b) In an action against a defendant who developed, modified, or used artificial intelligence that is alleged to have caused a harm to the plaintiff, it shall not be a defense, and the defendant may not assert, that the artificial intelligence autonomously caused the harm to the plaintiff.
